Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1730.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 66 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 30ASERVICE CONTRACTS FOR RESIDENTIAL TELECOMMUNICATIONS,CABLE AND INTERNET SERVICESSec.30A01. Definitions.30A02. Suspension and termination of contracts.30A03. Request process, representative authority and proof of admission.30A04. Equipment obligations.§ 30A01. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter 123456789101112131415161718 shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Cable television service." The transmission or provision of video programming to subscribers, including customer premises equipment, whether provided by a cable television company or another entity authorized under Federal or State law."Internet access service." A service that enables a user to access content, information, email or other services offered over the Internet."Long-term care facility." Any of the following:(1) A long-term care nursing facility as defined in section 802.1 of the act of July 19, 1979 (P.L.130, No.48), known as the Health Care Facilities Act.(2) An assisted living residence as defined in section 1001 of the act of June 13, 1967 (P.L.31, No.21), known as the Human Services Code.(3) A personal care home as defined in section 1001 of the Human Services Code."Physician." An individual licensed to practice medicine or osteopathic medicine in this Commonwealth or in another state."Service provider." A public utility or other entity that provides telecommunications service, cable television service or Internet access service to a service recipient in this Commonwealth."Service recipient." An individual residing in this Commonwealth who contracts with a service provider to receive telecommunications service, cable television service or Internet access service at a residential address located in this Co mmonwealth. "Telecommunications service." The offering of the 20250HB1730PN2130 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 transmission of messages or communications for a fee to the public.§ 30A02. Suspension and termination of contracts.(a) Eligibility.-- A service recipient admitted to a long- term care facility may request the suspension or termination of a service contract under this chapter.(b) Suspension of service.--A service provider shall suspend billing and service obligations under a service contract for at least 90 days upon receipt of a valid request under section 30A03 (relating to request process, representative authority and proof of admission). The service provider may not impose a fee, penalty or other charge in connection with the suspension.(c) Termination of service.-- If a service recipient remains admitted to a long-term care facility beyond the 90-day period specified under subsection (b), the service provider shall terminate the contract upon receipt of a valid request under section 30A03. The service provider may not impose a fee, penalty or other charge in connection with the termination.§ 30A03. Request process, representative authority and proof of admission.(a) Standardized form.-- A service provider shall, upon request, provide a standardized form to be completed by a service recipient and a physician to initiate a request under section 30A02 (relating to suspension and termination of contracts).(b) Legal representative.-- If a service recipient is unable to complete or submit the standardized form under subsection (a), a legal representative may do so on the service recipient's behalf. The legal representative shall submit documentation of authority, including a power of attorney or court order 20250HB1730PN2130 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 establishing guardianship or conservatorship, to the service provider.(c) Proof of admission.-- A service provider may require written proof of admission to a long-term care facility for the purpose of suspending or terminating a service contract under this chapter. The proof of admission requirement under this subsection shall be satisfied by submission of all of the following:(1) A written notice requesting suspension or termination.(2) A letter signed by a physician attesting to the service recipient's admission to a long-term care facility.§ 30A04. Equipment obligations.Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to relieve a service recipient of the obligation to return leased or rented equipment to a service provider or pay any lawful charge for unreturned equipment or any balance due for purchased equipment.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1730PN2130 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718